es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Ciclismo > Accesorios para bicicletas: Accesorios y soportes para bolsos de bicicletas; Bolsas y maletas para bicicletas; Accesorios para canastas de bicicletas; Cestas para bicicletas; Timbres y bocinas para bicicletas; Portabidones para bicicletas; Accesorios y repuestos para asientos infantiles para bicicletas; Asientos para llevar niños en bicicleta; Suministros de limpieza y mantenimiento para bicicletas; Accesorios de computadora para bicicletas; Computadoras para bicicletas; Fundas para bicicletas; Guardabarros para bicicletas; Protectores y calcomanías para cuadro de bicicleta; Portaequipajes delanteros y traseros para bicicletas; Accesorios decorativos y puños de manillar para bicicletas; Luces para bicicleta; Candados para bicicletas; Espejos para bicicletas; Soportes de teléfono para bicicleta; Piezas y accesorios para bombas de bicicletas; Bombas para bicicletas; Accesorios para portabicicletas; Fundas para asientos y sillines para bicicletas; Bomba para horquillas de bicicleta; Adornos para radios de bicicletas; Bases y soportes para almacenar bicicletas; Kits y parches de reparación para neumáticos de bicicletas; Clips y correas para pedales de bicicletas; Herramientas para bicicletas; Piezas y accesorios para remolques de bicicletas; Remolques para bicicletas; Entrenadores de bicicletas; Ruedas de apoyo para bicicletas; Maletas y bolsas de transporte para bicicletas; Bacas para planchas de surf para bicicletas; Kits de conversión eléctrica para bicicletas
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Radfahren > Fahrradzubehör: Zubehör & Halterungen für Fahrradtaschen; Fahrradtaschen & -körbe; Zubehör für Fahrradkörbe; Fahrradkörbe; Fahrradklingeln & -hupen; Halterungen für Fahrradrahmen; Zubehör für Kinderfahrradsitze; Kinderfahrradsitze; Fahrradreinigungs- & Pflegeprodukte; Zubehör für Fahrradcomputer; Fahrradcomputer; Fahrradabdeckungen; Fahrradschutzbleche; Fahrrad-Rahmenschutz & Aufkleber; Fahrradgepäckträger; Griffe und Dekor für Fahrradlenker; Fahrradbeleuchtung; Fahrradschlösser; Fahrradspiegel; Fahrrad-Handyhalterungen; Ersatzteile & Zubehör für Fahrradpumpen; Fahrradpumpen; Zubehör für Fahrradgepäckträger; Fahrradsattelbezüge & -polster; Dämpferpumpen; Fahrradspeichen-Reflektoren; Fahrradständer & Fahrradparksysteme; Flicken & Reparatur-Sets; Fahrrad-Fußriemen; Fahrradwerkzeug; Ersatzteile & Zubehör für Fahrradanhänger; Fahrradanhänger; Trainingsrollen; Stützräder; Fahrradtaschen & -koffer; Surfbretthalterungen für Fahrräder; Umrüstsatz für E-Bikes
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Bicyklovanie > Príslušenstvo pre bicykle: Príslušenstvo a držiaky na cyklistické tašky; Tašky a brašne na bicykel; Príslušenstvo pre cyklistické košíky; Košíky na bicykle; Bicyklové zvončeky a klaksóny; Klietky na bicykle; Príslušenstvo a diely pre detské sedačky na bicykel; Detské sedačky na bicykle; Potreby na čistenie a údržbu bicyklov; Príslušenstvo k cyklopočítačom; Cyklopočítače; Obaly na bicykle; Blatníky na bicykle; Ochrana rámu bicykla a nálepky; Predné a zadné nosiče bicyklov; Gripy a dekor na riadidlách bicykla; Svetlá na bicykle; Zámky na bicykle; Zrkadlá na bicykle; Držiaky na telefóny na bicykle; Diely a príslušenstvo pre cyklistické pumpy; Pumpy na bicykle; Príslušenstvo pre stojany na bicykle; Cyklistické sedlá a poťahy na sedadlá; Bicyklové pumpy na vidlice a tlmiče; Korálky na bicykle; Stojany na bicykle; Potreby a súpravy na opravu plášťa bicykla; Remienky a svorky na nohy na bicykli; Cyklonáradie; Súčiastky a príslušenstvo pre cyklistické prívesy; Prívesy na bicykle; Cyklotrenažéry; Tréningové kolieska na bicykle; Tašky a kufre na prepravu bicyklov; Stojany na vodné bicykle; Súpravy na konverziu elektrobicyklov
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Vélo > Accessoires de cyclisme: Accessoires et supports pour sacoches de vélos; Sacoches pour vélo; Accessoires de paniers de vélos; Paniers de vélo; Sonnettes et klaxons de vélo; Portebidons; Accessoires et pièces de sièges d'enfant pour vélo; Sièges de vélo pour enfants; Produits de nettoyage et d’entretien de vélo; Accessoires de cyclomètres; Cyclomètres; Housses de vélo; Garde-boue de vélo; Protections de cadre de vélo et autocollants; Porte-bagages de vélo; Poignées et décorations pour guidons de vélo; Éclairages de vélo; Antivols pour vélos; Rétroviseurs vélo; Supports de téléphone pour vélo; Pièces et accessoires de pompes à vélo; Pompes pour vélos; Accessoires de porte-vélos; Couvre-selles pour vélos; Pompes pour amortisseurs de vélo; Perles de rayons de vélo; Supports et rangements pour vélos; Kits de réparation de pneus de vélo; Cale-pieds et sangles pour vélo; Outils pour vélos; Pièces et accessoires de remorques de vélos; Remorques de vélo; Vélos d'entraînement; Roulettes de vélo; Étuis et sacs de transport pour vélos; Porte-planches de sports nautiques pour vélos; Kits de conversion pour vélo électrique
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Kolarstwo > Akcesoria do rowerów: Akcesoria i mocowania do toreb rowerowych; Sakwy i torby rowerowe; Akcesoria do koszyków rowerowych; Koszyki rowerowe; Dzwonki i klaksony rowerowe; Koszyki na bidony; Akcesoria i części do fotelików rowerowych; Foteliki rowerowe; Środki do czyszczenia i konserwacji rowerów; Akcesoria elektroniczne do rowerów; Liczniki rowerowe; Pokrowce na rowery; Błotniki rowerowe; Ochrona i naklejki na ramę rowerową; Bagażniki rowerowe; Uchwyty i elementy dekoracyjne do kierownic rowerowych; Oświetlenie rowerowe; Zapięcia rowerowe; Lusterka rowerowe; Uchwyty rowerowe na telefon; Części i akcesoria do pompek rowerowych; Pompki rowerowe; Akcesoria do bagażników rowerowych; Pokrowce i nakładki na siodełka rowerowe; Pompki do amortyzatorów; Koraliki na szprychy; Przechowywanie rowerów; Łaty i zestawy naprawcze do opon rowerowych; Strzemiona i zaczepy; Narzędzia do rowerów; Części i akcesoria do przyczepek rowerowych; Przyczepki rowerowe; Trenażery rowerowe; Kółka boczne do roweru; Torby i kufry rowerowe; Bagażniki rowerowe na deskę surfingową; Cześci do wakeboardingu
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Cykling > Cykeltilbehør: Tilbehør og beslag til cykeltasker; Cykeltasker og -kurve; Tilbehør til cykelkurve; Cykelkurve; Ringeklokker og horn; Cykelvandflaskeholdere; Tilbehør og dele til cykelbarnesæder; Cykelsæder; Rengørings- og vedligeholdelsesprodukter til cykler; Cykelcomputere – tilbehør; Cykelcomputere; Cykeldækkener; Cykelskærme; Stelbeskyttelse og klistermærker til cykler; Cykelbagagebærere; Cykelstyrstilpasning og -dekoration; Cykellygter; Cykellåse; Cykelspejle; Telefonholdere til cykler; Dele og tilbehør til cykelpumper; Cykelpumper; Tilbehør til cykelbagagebærere; Cykelsadler og sædeovertræk; Højtrykspumper til cykler; Perler til cykeleger; Cykelstel og -opbevaring; Cykellapper og reparationskit; Tåclips til cykelpedaler; Cykelværktøjer; Dele og tilbehør til cykelanhængere; Cykeltrailere; Cykeltræningsudstyr; Støttehjul til cykel; Cykel – transporttasker og -kasser; Cykelsurfboardstativer; Sæt til konvertering til elcykel
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 單車 > 自行車配件: 自行車包配件與支架; 自行車袋/馬鞍袋; 自行車車籃配件; 自行車籃; 自行車鈴鐺/喇叭; 自行車水壺架; 自行車兒童座椅配件/零件; 自行車兒童座椅; 自行車清潔與保養用品; 自行車碼表配件; 自行車電腦; 自行車防塵套; 自行車擋泥板; 自行車車架保護貼與貼花; 自行車前後貨架; 自行車手把/裝飾; 自行車燈; 自行車鎖; 自行車後照鏡; 自行車手機架; 自行車打氣筒零件與配件; 自行車打氣筒; 自行車貨架配件; 自行車座墊套; 自行車避震器打氣筒; 自行車輻條彩珠; 自行車架/停放裝置; 自行車輪胎修補用品/套組; 自行車趾夾帶; 自行車工具; 自行車拖車零件與配件; 自行車拖車; 自行車訓練台; 自行車輔助輪; 自行車搬運保護袋/保護盒; 自行車衝浪板托架; 電動自行車轉換組
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > ปั่นจักรยาน > อุปกรณ์จักรยาน: อุปกรณ์เสริมและตัวยึดกระเป๋าจักรยาน; กระเป๋าและถุงใส่ของบนจักรยาน; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับตะกร้าจักรยาน; ตะกร้าจักรยาน; กระดิ่งและแตรจักรยาน; ที่ใส่ขวดน้ำของจักรยาน; อุปกรณ์เสริมและอะไหล่ที่นั่งเด็กสำหรับจักรยาน; ที่นั่งเด็กสำหรับจักรยาน; อุปกรณ์ทำความสะอาดและดูแลรักษาจักรยาน; อุปกรณ์คอมพิวเตอร์สำหรับจักรยาน; คอมพิวเตอร์ของจักรยาน; ที่คลุมจักรยาน; บังโคลนจักรยาน; แผ่นกันรอยและสติกเกอร์ติดเฟรมจักรยาน; ตะแกรงหน้าและหลังจักรยาน; ที่จับและของตกแต่งแฮนด์จักรยาน; ไฟจักรยาน; ล็อกจักรยาน; กระจกจักรยาน; ที่จับโทรศัพท์สำหรับจักรยาน; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับที่สูบลมจักรยาน; ที่สูบจักรยาน; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับแร็คจักรยาน; ที่รองอานจักรยานและที่คลุมอาน; สูบช็อคสำหรับจักรยาน; ลูกปัดแกนล้อจักรยาน; ที่ตั้งและจัดเก็บจักรยาน; ชุดและอุปกรณ์ซ่อมแซมยางจักรยาน; โทคลิปและสายรัดสำหรับจักรยาน; เครื่องมือจักรยาน; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับรถพ่วงจักรยาน; ที่พ่วงจักรยาน; เทรนเนอร์จักรยาน; ล้อกันล้มของจักรยาน; ถุงและกล่องใส่จักรยาน; ชั้นวางบอร์ดกีฬาทางน้ำสำหรับจักรยาน; ชุดผลิตกระแสไฟฟ้าจากจักรยาน
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 自行车用品 > 自行车配件: 自行车包配件和支架; 骑行包/背筐; 自行车车筐配件; 自行车框; 自行车铃/喇叭; 自行车水壶架; 自行车儿童座椅配件/零件; 自行车儿童座椅; 自行车清洁和维护用品; 自行车码表配件; 自行车码表; 自行车罩; 自行车挡泥板; 自行车车架保护贴和贴花; 自行车前置/后置货架; 自行车把套/装饰; 自行车灯; 自行车锁; 自行车后视镜; 自行车手机支架; 自行车打气筒零件和配件; 自行车打气筒; 自行车货架配件; 自行车坐垫与座套; 自行车后避震打气筒; 自行车辐条彩珠; 自行车停车架; 自行车轮胎维修套装; 自行车踏脚套/带; 自行车工具; 自行车拖车零件和配件; 自行车拖车; 自行车训练台; 自行车训练轮; 自行车携车袋; 自行车水上运动板架; 电动自行车转换工具包
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Đạp xe > Linh kiện xe đạp: Giá đỡ và phụ kiện túi xe đạp; Giỏ và túi xe đạp; Phụ kiện giỏ xe đạp; Giỏ xe đạp; Chuông & Còi xe đạp; Lồng xe đạp; Phụ tùng & bộ phận ghế ngồi trẻ em cho xe đạp; Ghế ngồi xe đạp trẻ em; Vật tư vệ sinh & bảo dưỡng xe đạp; Phụ kiện cho đồng hồ xe đạp; Máy tính cho xe đạp; Bạt phủ xe đạp; Chắn bùn xe đạp; Decal & miếng bảo vệ khung xe đạp; Giá trước & sau xe đạp; Bọc và trang trí tay lái xe đạp; Đèn xe đạp; Khóa xe đạp; Kính xe đạp; Giá đỡ điện thoại cho xe đạp; Phụ kiện và bộ phận bơm xe đạp; Bơm xe đạp; Phụ kiện giá chở hàng xe đạp; Bọc yên và ghế xe đạp; Ống bơm phuộc cho xe đạp; Hạt căm xe đạp; Giá treo xe đạp; Bộ dụng cụ vá xe đạp; Dây đai pedal và dây kẹp ống quần khi đi xe đạp; Dụng cụ xe đạp; Phụ kiện và bộ phận rơ-moóc xe đạp; Rơ-moóc xe đạp; Huấn luyện viên xe đạp; Bánh phụ xe đạp; Túi đựng xe đạp; Giá đỡ gắn trên xe đạp dùng để vận chuyển ván trượt nước; Bộ chuyển đổi cho xe đạp điện
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Dviračių sportas > Dviračių priedai: Dviračių krepšių priedai ir tvirtinimai; Dviračių krepšiai ir balnakrepšiai; Dviračių krepšių priedai; Dviračių krepšeliai; Dviračių skambučiai ir garso signalai; Dviračių narvai; Vaikiškų kėdučių dviračiams priedai ir dalys; Vaikiškos kėdutės dviračiams; Dviračių valymo ir priežiūros reikmenys; Dviračių kompiuterių priedai; Dviračių kompiuteriai; Dviračių uždangalai; Dviračių purvasaugiai; Dviračių rėmo apsaugos ir lipdukai; Dviračių priekiniai ir galiniai laikikliai; Dviračių vairų rankenos ir papuošimai; Dviračių žibintai; Dviračių spynos; Dviračių veidrodėliai; Dviračių telefonų laikikliai; Dviračių pompų dalys ir priedai; Dviračių pompos; Dviračių laikiklių priedai; Dviračių balnelių pagalvės ir sėdynių apvalkalai; Dviračių amortizatoriai; Dviračių stipinų karoliukai; Dviračių stovai ir laikymas; Dviračių padangų remonto reikmenys ir rinkiniai; Dviračių pėdų dirželiai ir segtukai; Dviračių įrankiai; Dviračių priekabų dalys ir priedai; Dviračių priekabos; Dviračių treniruokliai; Mokymosi važiuoti dviračiu ratukai; Dviračių transportavimo krepšiai ir dėklai; Vandens sporto lentų laikikliai dviračiams; Elektrinių dviračių perdarymo rinkiniai
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Ciclism > Accesorii pentru biciclete: Accesorii și suporturi de prindere pentru genți de bicicletă; Genți și genți pentru roată pentru biciclete; Accesorii pentru coșuri de bicicletă; Coșuri pentru biciclete; Claxoane pentru biciclete; Cuști pentru biciclete; Accesorii și piese pentru scaune pentru copii pentru biciclete; Scaune pentru copii pentru biciclete; Consumabile de curățare și întreținere pentru bicicletă; Accesorii computer pentru biciclete; Computere pentru biciclete; Huse pentru biciclete; Apărători pentru biciclete; Protecție pentru cadrul bicicletei și autocolante decorative; Suporturi față și spate pentru biciclete; Mânere și decorațiuni pentru ghidon bicicletă; Lumini de bicicletă; Antifurturi pentru biciclete; Oglinzi pentru biciclete; Suporturi de telefon pentru bicicletă; Piese și accesorii pentru pompe de bicicletă; Pompe pentru biciclete; Accesorii pentru suporturi de bicicletă; Inserții șa și huse pentru scaune pentru biciclete; Pompe suspensii pentru biciclete; Bile pentru spițe pentru biciclete; Suporturi și depozitare pentru biciclete; Accesorii și seturi pentru repararea anvelopelor de biciclete; Curele și cleme pentru degete pentru biciclete; Unelte pentru biciclete; Piese și accesorii pentru remorci de bicicletă; Remorci pentru biciclete; Accesorii pentru ciclism; Roți de antrenament pentru biciclete; Genți și huse de transport pentru biciclete; Suporturi de depozitare pentru plăci pentru sporturi nautice cu biciclete; Kituri de conversie pentru biciclete electrice
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Biciklizam > Pribor za bicikle: Dodaci i nosači za torbe za bicikle; Torbe i košare za bicikle; Dodaci za košare za bicikle; Korpa za bicikle; Zvona i trube za bicikle; Kavezi za bicikle; Dodaci i dijelovi za dječje sjedalice za bicikle; Dječja sjedala za bicikle; Pribor za čišćenje i održavanje bicikla; Oprema za biciklistička računala; Biciklistička računala; Navlake za bicikle; Blatobrani; Zaštita i naljepnice za okvir bicikla; Prednji i stražnji nosači za bicikle; Ručke i dekoracija za upravljač bicikla; Svjetla za bicikl; Lokoti za bicikle; Retrovizori za bicikle; Držači za telefone za bicikl; Dijelovi i dodaci za pumpu za bicikl; Pumpe za bicikle; Dodaci za stalke za bicikle; Jastučići i presvlake za sjedala za bicikle; Amortizerske pumpe za bicikle; Perle za žbice za bicikle; Stalci i spremišta za bicikle; Oprema i setovi za popravak guma za bicikle; Trake i kopče za pedale bicikla; Alati za bicikle; Dijelovi i dodaci za prikolice za bicikl; Prikolice za bicikle; Trenažeri za bicikle; Pomoćni kotačići za bicikl; Torbe i koferi za prijevoz bicikala; Stalci za pohranu dasaka za vodene biciklističke sportove; Setovi za preinaku električnih bicikala
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Pyöräily > Pyöräilytarvikkeet: Polkupyörän laukkujen lisävarusteet ja kiinnikkeet; Pyörälaukut ja pyörän sivulaukut; Polkupyörän korien lisävarusteet; Polkupyörän korit; Polkupyörän soittokellot ja -torvet; Polkupyörähäkit; Polkupyörän lastenistuimen lisätarvikkeet ja -osat; Lastenistuimet polkupyörään; Polkupyörän puhdistus- ja huoltotarvikkeet; Polkupyörätietokoneiden lisätarvikkeet; Polkupyörätietokoneet; Polkupyöräpeitteet; Pyörän lokasuojat; Polkupyörän rungonsuojat ja tarrat; Polkupyörän etu- ja takatarakat; Polkupyörän ohjaustangon pehmusteet ja koristeet; Pyöränvalot; Polkupyörän lukot; Polkupyörän peilit; Polkupyörän puhelintelineet; Polkupyörän pumppujen osat ja lisävarusteet; Polkupyörän pumput; Polkupyörän telineiden lisävarusteet; Polkupyörän satulapehmusteet ja istuinsuojat; Polkupyörän iskaripumput; Polkupyörän pinnakoristeet; Polkupyörätelineet ja säilytys; Polkupyöränrenkaan korjaustarvikkeet ja -setit; Polkupyörän varvashihat ja -koukut; Polkupyörätyökalut; Polkupyörän peräkärryjen osat ja lisävarusteet; Polkupyöräkärryt; Polkupyörän harjoitusvastukset; Polkupyörän harjoitusrenkaat; Polkupyörän kuljetuspussit ja -kotelot; Polkupyörän vesiurheilulautojen telineet; Sähköpyörän muunnossarjat
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Ciclismo > Acessórios para bicicletas: Acessórios e suportes para bolsas de bicicleta; Sacos e cestinhas para bicicletas; Acessórios para cestas de bicicleta; Cestinhas para bicicletas; Buzinas e campainhas para bicicletas; Gaiolas para bicicletas; Peças e acessórios de cadeiras infantis para bicicleta; Assentos de bicicletas para crianças; Produtos de limpeza e manutenção de bicicleta; Acessórios para computador de bicicleta; Computadores para bicicletas; Capas para bicicletas; Para-lamas para bicicletas; Proteção e adesivos para quadro de bicicleta; Suportes dianteiros e traseiros para bicicletas; Punhos e decoração para guidão de bicicleta; Luzes para bicicleta; Cadeados para bicicletas; Retrovisores para bicicletas; Suportes de celular para bicicleta; Peças e acessórios para bombas de bicicleta; Bombas para bicicletas; Acessórios para bagageiros de bicicleta; Acolchoamento e capas para assentos de bicicleta; Bombas de pressão para bicicleta; Enfeites para roda de bicicleta; Suportes e armazenamento de bicicletas; Conjuntos de reparos e remendos em pneus de bicicleta; Biqueiras e presilhas para bicicleta; Ferramentas para bicicletas; Peças e acessórios para reboques de bicicleta; Trailers para bicicletas; Aparelhos para treinamento com bicicleta; Rodas para treinamento com bicicleta; Sacos e estojos de transporte de bicicletas; Racks de prancha de surf para bicicleta; Kits de conversão para bicicletas elétricas
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Kolesarjenje > Dodatki za kolesa: Dodatki in nosilci za kolesarske torbe; Kolesarske torbe in prtljažniki; Dodatki za kolesarske košare; Košarice za kolo; Zvonci in hupe za kolesa; Držala za kolesa; Dodatki in deli za otroške sedeže za kolesa; Kolesarski sedeži za otroke; Pripomočki za čiščenje in vzdrževanje koles; Dodatki za kolesarski računalnik; Kolesarski računalniki; Prevleke za kolesa; Blatniki za kolo; Zaščita okvirja in nalepke za kolesa; Sprednji in zadnji nosilci za kolesa; Ročaji in okraski za krmilo kolesa; Luči za kolesa; Ključavnice za kolesa; Kolesarska ogledala; Nosilci za telefon za kolesa; Deli in dodatki za kolesarske tlačilke; Tlačilke za kolesa; Dodatki za nosilce za kolesa; Podloge in prevleke za blazine za sedež; Črpalke za amortizerje za kolesa; Kroglice za kolesarske napere; Stojala za kolesa in shranjevanje; Pripomočki in kompleti za popravilo kolesarskih pnevmatik; Pasovi in sponke za pritrditev stopal; Orodje za kolesa; Deli in dodatki za prikolice za kolesa; Prikolice za kolesa; Kolesarski trenažerji; Pomožna kolesa za kolo; Torbe in kovčki za prevoz koles; Stojala za deske za vodne športe na kolesu; Kompleti za električne predelave koles
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Ciclismo > Acessórios para bicicleta: Acessórios e suportes para sacos de bicicleta; Sacos e alforges para bicicleta; Acessórios para cestos de bicicleta; Cestos para bicicleta; Buzinas e campainhas para bicicleta; Porta-bidões para bicicleta; Acessórios e peças de assento para crianças para bicicleta; Assentos para criança para bicicleta; Artigos de limpeza e manutenção de bicicleta; Acessórios de computador para bicicleta; Computadores para bicicleta; Coberturas para bicicleta; Guarda-lamas para bicicleta; Proteção e autocolantes para quadro de bicicleta; Estruturas dianteiras e traseiras para bicicleta; Decoração e punhos de guiador para bicicleta; Luzes de bicicleta; Cadeados para bicicleta; Espelhos para bicicleta; Suportes de telemóvel para bicicleta; Peças e acessórios para bombas de bicicleta; Bombas para bicicleta; Acessórios para porta-bagagens de bicicleta; Coberturas de assento e proteções de selim para bicicleta; Bombas de suspensão para bicicleta; Esferas de raios para bicicleta; Armazenamento e suportes para bicicleta; Kits e artigos de reparação de pneus para bicicleta; Encaixes e fitas de pés para bicicleta; Ferramentas para bicicleta; Peças e acessórios para atrelados de bicicleta; Atrelados para bicicleta; Dispositivos de treino para bicicleta; Rodas de treino para bicicleta; Sacos e estojos de transporte de bicicletas; Suportes de pranchas de desportos aquáticos para bicicleta; Conjuntos de conversão para bicicleta elétrica
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > サイクリング > 自転車関連用品: 自転車用バッグアクセサリー＆マウント; 自転車用荷物入れ; 自転車用バスケットアクセサリー; 自転車カゴ; 自転車用ベル; 自転車用ケージ; 自転車用チャイルドシート関連用品・部品; 自転車用チャイルドシート; 自転車用クリーニング・メンテナンス用品; サイクルコンピューター関連用品; サイクルコンピューター; 自転車カバー; 自転車泥よけ; 自転車用フレーム保護・デカール; 自転車荷台; 自転車ハンドルバー グリップ、自転車ハンドルバー装飾品; 自転車用ライト; 自転車用ロック; 自転車用ミラー; 自転車用スマホマウント; 自転車用空気入れパーツ＆アクセサリー; 自転車空気入れ; 自転車用ラックアクセサリー; 自転車サドルカバー; 自転車用ショックポンプ; 自転車用スポークビーズ; 自転車スタンド・収納器具; 自転車タイヤ用パッチ・修理キット; 自転車用トーストラップ・トークリップ; 自転車用工具; 自転車用トレーラーパーツ＆アクセサリー; 自転車用トレーラー; 自転車トレーニング用品; 自転車補助輪; 自転車用キャリーバッグ・収納ケース; 自転車用サーフボードキャリア; 自転車電動化キット
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Kerékpározás > Kerékpár-kiegészítők: Kerékpártáska-kiegészítők és -tartók; Kerékpártáskák és -oldaltáskák; Kerékpárkosár-kiegészítők; Kerékpárkosarak; Kerékpárcsengők és -kürtök; Kerékpárketrecek; Kerékpárgyermekülés-kiegészítők és -alkatrészek; Kerékpár-gyermekülések; Kerékpártisztítási és -karbantartási kellékek; Kerékpárkomputer-kiegészítők; Kerékpárkomputerek; Kerékpárhuzatok; Kerékpársárvédők; Kerékpárváz-védők és -matricák; Kerékpáros első és hátsó állványok; Kerékpárkormány-fogantyúk és -dekoráció; Kerékpárlámpák; Kerékpárzárak; Kerékpártükrök; Kerékpáros telefontartók; Kerékpárpumpa-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Kerékpárpumpák; Kerékpárcsomagtartó-kiegészítők; Kerékpár-nyeregbetétek és -üléshuzatok; Kerékpáros teleszkóppumpák; Kerékpárküllőgyöngyök; Kerékpártartók és -tárolók; Kerékpárabroncs-javító kellékek és készletek; Kerékpáros lábfejpántok és kapcsok; Kerékpárszerszámok; Kerékpárutánfutó-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Kerékpár-utánfutók; Kerékpáredzők; Kerékpáredző kerekek; Kerékpárszállító táskák és tokok; Kerékpáros vízisportdeszka-állványok; Elektromoskerékpár-átalakító készletek
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Fietsen > Fietsaccessoires: Accessoires en houders voor fietstassen; Fietstassen; Accessoires voor fietsmanden; Fietsmandjes; Fietsbellen en -toeters; Fietskooien; Accessoires en onderdelen voor fietsstoeltjes voor kinderen; Fietsstoeltjes voor kinderen; Reinigings- en onderhoudsartikelen voor fietsen; Accessoires voor fietscomputers; Fietscomputers; Fietshoezen; Fietsspatborden; Fietsframebescherming en stickers; Fietsenrekken (voor en achter); Stuurgrepen en -decoratie voor fietsen; Fietsverlichting; Fietssloten; Fietsspiegels; Telefoonhouders voor fietsen; Onderdelen en accessoires voor fietspompen; Fietspompen; Accessoires voor fietsendragers; Zadelkussens en zadelhoezen voor fietsen; Shockpompen; Spaakkralen; Fietsenstandaarden; Bandenpleisters en reparatiesets voor fietsen; Toeclips en riempjes; Fietsgereedschap; Onderdelen en accessoires voor fietskarren; Fietstrailers; Zijwieltjes voor fietsen; Fietswieltjes; Vervoertassen en -koffers voor fietsen; Surfkarren voor fietsen; Ombouwsets voor elektrische fietsen
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 사이클링 > 자전거 부대용품: 자전거 가방 액세서리 및 마운트; 자전거 가방/짐가방; 자전거 바구니 액세서리; 자전거 바구니; 자전거 벨/경적; 자전거용 케이지; 자전거 유아 좌석 부대용품/부품; 자전거 유아 좌석; 자전거 세척 및 유지보수 용품; 자전거 컴퓨터 부대용품; 자전거 컴퓨터; 자전거 커버; 자전거 펜더; 자전거 프레임 보호재 및 데칼; 자전거 전면/후면 랙; 자전거 핸들 손잡이/장식; 자전거 라이트; 자전거 자물쇠; 자전거 후사경; 자전거 폰 거치대; 자전거 펌프 부품 및 액세서리; 자전거 펌프; 자전거 랙 액세서리; 자전거 안장 패드/커버; 자전거 쇼크 펌프; 자전거 바큇살 비즈; 자전거 스탠드/보관대; 자전거 타이어 수리 용품/키트; 자전거 토스트랩/토클립; 자전거 공구; 자전거 트레일러 부품 및 액세서리; 자전거 트레일러; 자전거 트레이너; 자전거 보조 바퀴; 자전거 운반용 가방/케이스; 자전거용 수상 스포츠 보드 랙; 전기 자전거 변환 키트
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Sykling > Sykkeltilbehør: Tilbehør og fester for sykkelvesker; Sykkelvesker; Tilbehør til sykkelkurv; Sykkelkurver; Ringeklokker og horn; Sykkelbur; Tilbehør og deler til sykkelbarneseter; Sykkelbarneseter; Utstyr for rengjøring og vedlikehold av sykkel; Datatilbehør til sykkel; Sykkelcomputere; Sykkeltrekk; Sykkelskjermer; Rammebeskyttelse og klistremerker for sykkel; Front- og bakstativer til sykkel; Sykkelbøylegrep og -dekor; Sykkellys; Sykkellåser; Sykkelspeil; Mobilholdere for sykkel; Deler og tilbehør til sykkelpumpe; Sykkelpumper; Tilbehør til bagasjebrett; Sykkelsalputer og setetrekk; Sykkeldemperpumper; Sykkeleikeperler; Sykkelstativer og -lagring; Materiell og sett for reparasjon av sykkeldekk; Sykkelstroppesett og -klips; Sykkelverktøy; Deler og tilbehør til sykkelhenger; Sykkeltilhengere; Sykkeltrening; Støttehjul for sykkel; Transportvesker og -kasser for sykkel; Brettstativer til vannsport for sykkel; Konverteringssett for elektrisk sykkel
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Cycling > Bicycle Accessories: Bicycle Bag Accessories & Mounts; Bicycle Bags & Panniers; Bicycle Basket Accessories; Bicycle Baskets; Bicycle Bells & Horns; Bicycle Cages; Bicycle Child Seat Accessories & Parts; Bicycle Child Seats; Bicycle Cleaning & Maintenance Supplies; Bicycle Computer Accessories; Bicycle Computers; Bicycle Covers; Bicycle Fenders; Bicycle Frame Protection & Decals; Bicycle Front & Rear Racks; Bicycle Handlebar Grips & Decor; Bicycle Lights; Bicycle Locks; Bicycle Mirrors; Bicycle Phone Mounts; Bicycle Pump Parts & Accessories; Bicycle Pumps; Bicycle Rack Accessories; Bicycle Saddle Pads & Seat Covers; Bicycle Shock Pumps; Bicycle Spoke Beads; Bicycle Stands & Storage; Bicycle Tire Repair Supplies & Kits; Bicycle Toe Straps & Clips; Bicycle Tools; Bicycle Trailer Parts & Accessories; Bicycle Trailers; Bicycle Trainers; Bicycle Training Wheels; Bicycle Transport Bags & Cases; Bicycle Water Sport Board Racks; Electric Bicycle Conversion Kits
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Ciclismo > Accessori per biciclette: Accessori e supporti per borse da bicicletta; Borse e zaini da bicicletta; Accessori per cestini da bicicletta; Cestini da bicicletta; Campanelli e trombette bicicletta; Gabbie portabiciclette; Accessori e componenti per seggiolini per bambini per bicicletta; Seggiolini da bicicletta per bambini; Articoli per la pulizia e la manutenzione della bicicletta; Accessori computer per biciclette; Computer per biciclette; Teli per biciclette; Parafanghi per biciclette; Protezioni e adesivi per telaio della bicicletta; Portapacchi anteriori/posteriori bici; Maniglie ed elementi decorativi per manubri di biciclette; Luci per bicicletta; Lucchetti per bici; Specchietti per bicicletta; Supporti da bicicletta per telefono; Componenti e accessori per pompe da bicicletta; Pompe per bicicletta; Accessori per portapacchi da bicicletta; Coperture e imbottiture per sellini di biciclette; Pompe per ammortizzatori per biciclette; Perle per raggi di bicicletta; Supporti e portabiciclette; Toppe e kit di riparazione per pneumatici di bicicletta; Velcro e mollette per pantaloni per ciclisti; Strumenti per bicicletta; Componenti e accessori per rimorchi da bicicletta; Rimorchi per bicicletta; Rimorchi bici; Rotelle laterali bicicletta; Borse e scatole trasporto bici; Portatavola da sport acquatici per biciclette; Kit di conversione bici elettriche
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ποδηλασία > Αξεσουάρ ποδηλάτου: Αξεσουάρ & βάσεις για τσάντες ποδηλάτου; Τσάντες & σακίδια ποδηλάτου; Αξεσουάρ καλαθιών ποδηλάτου; Καλάθια ποδηλάτου; Κουδούνια & Κόρνες ποδηλάτου; Βάσεις ποδηλάτων; Αξεσουάρ & εξαρτήματα παιδικών καθισμάτων ποδηλάτων; Παιδικά καθίσματα ποδηλάτων; Είδη καθαρισμού & συντήρησης ποδηλάτου; Αξεσουάρ υπολογιστή ποδηλάτου; Υπολογιστές ποδηλάτου; Καλύμματα ποδηλάτου; Φτερά ποδηλάτου; Προστατευτικά & αυτοκόλλητα σκελετού ποδηλάτου; Μπροστινές και οπίσθιες σχάρες ποδηλάτων; Λαβές και διακοσμήσεις για τιμόνι ποδηλάτου; Φώτα ποδηλάτου; Κλειδαριές ποδηλάτου; Καθρέφτες ποδηλάτου; Βάσεις τηλεφώνου για ποδήλατο; Εξαρτήματα & αξεσουάρ τρόμπας ποδηλάτου; Τρόμπες ποδηλάτου; Αξεσουάρ σχαρών ποδηλάτου; Μαξιλαράκια σέλας & καλύμματα καθισμάτων ποδηλάτου; Τρόμπες αμορτισέρ ποδηλάτου; Χάντρες ακτίνων ποδηλάτου; Βάσεις & αποθήκευση ποδηλάτου; Υλικά & κιτ επισκευής ελαστικών ποδηλάτου; Λουράκια & κλιπ ποδηλάτου; Εργαλεία ποδηλάτου; Εξαρτήματα & αξεσουάρ για τρέιλερ ποδηλάτου; Τρέιλερ ποδηλάτου; Προπονητήρια ποδηλάτου; Βοηθητικές ρόδες ποδηλάτου; Τσάντες & θήκες μεταφοράς ποδηλάτου; Σχάρες ποδηλάτου για σανίδες θαλάσσιων σπορ; Κιτ μετατροπής ηλεκτρικού ποδηλάτου
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Cykling > Cykeltillbehör: Tillbehör och fästen för cykelväskor; Cykelväskor och packväskor; Tillbehör för cykelkorgar; Cykelkorgar; Ringklockor och signalhorn; Flaskhållare för cyklar; Tillbehör och delar till cykelbarnstol; Barnstolar för cyklar; Rengörings- och underhållsprodukter för cyklar; Tillbehör till cykeldatorer; Cykeldatorer; Cykelöverdrag; Cykelstänkskärmar; Ramskydd och dekaler för cyklar; Främre och bakre cykeldrev; Cykelhandtag och dekor; Cykellampor; Cykellås; Cykelspeglar; Cykelhållare för mobiler; Delar och tillbehör för cykelpumpar; Cykelpumpar; Tillbehör för pakethållare; Sadeldynor och sätesskydd för cyklar; Stötdämpare för cyklar; Ekerkulor för cykel; Cykelställ och cykelförvaring; Lagningslappar och reparationssatser för cykeldäck; Tåband och -clips för cykel; Cykelverktyg; Delar och tillbehör för cykelvagnar; Cykelvagnar; Cykeltrainers; Stödhjul för cyklar; Transportsäckar och lådor för cyklar; Surfbrädefästen för cyklar; Satser för elcykelskonvertering
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Bisiklet > Bisiklet Aksesuarları: Bisiklet çantası aksesuarları ve bağlantı aparatları; Bisiklet Çantaları ve Bagaj Çantaları; Bisiklet sepeti aksesuarları; Bisiklet Sepetleri; Bisiklet Zilleri ve Kornaları; Bisiklet Park Etme Kafesleri; Bisiklet Çocuk Koltuğu Aksesuarları ve Parçaları; Bisiklet Çocuk Koltukları; Bisiklet temizlik ve bakım malzemeleri; Bisiklet Bilgisayarı Aksesuarları; Bisiklet Bilgisayarları; Bisiklet Kılıfları; Bisiklet Çamurlukları; Bisiklet kadro koruyucuları ve etiketleri; Bisiklet Ön ve Arka Oturakları; Bisiklet Gidonu Tutacakları ve Süslemeleri; Bisiklet ışıkları; Bisiklet Kilitleri; Bisiklet Aynaları; Bisiklet telefon tutucuları; Bisiklet pompası parçaları ve aksesuarları; Bisiklet Pompaları; Bisiklet bagajı aksesuarları; Bisiklet Sele Süngerleri ve Koltuk Kılıfları; Bisiklet Hız Göstergesi; Bisiklet Jant Teli Boncukları; Bisiklet Parkları ve Depoları; Bisiklet Lastik Yamaları ve Onarım Setleri; Bisiklet Pedalı Kayışları ve Klipsleri; Bisiklet Araçları; Bisiklet römorku parçaları ve aksesuarları; Bisiklet Römorkları; Bisiklet Eğitim Cihazı; Bisiklet Yan Destek Tekerlekleri; Bisiklet Taşıma Çanta ve Kılıfları; Bisiklet Su Sporu Tahtası Rafları; Elektrikli Bisiklet Dönüştürme Setleri
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Колоездене > Аксесоари за велосипеди: Аксесоари и стойки за велосипедни чанти; Чанти и кошове за велосипеди; Аксесоари за кошници за велосипеди; Кошници за велосипеди; Велосипедни звънци и клаксони; Клетки за велосипеди; Аксесоари и части за детски столчета за велосипеди; Детски седалки за велосипеди; Консумативи за почистване и поддръжка на велосипеди; Аксесоари за компютърни устройства за велосипед; Велосипедни компютри; Покривала за велосипед; Калници за велосипеди; Протектори и стикери за велосипедна рамка; Предни и задни багажници за велосипеди; Дръжки и декорация на кормилото на велосипед; Велосипедни светлини; Ключалки за велосипед; Огледала за велосипеди; Стойки за телефон за велосипеди; Части и аксесоари за велосипедни помпи; Велосипедни помпи; Аксесоари за багажници за велосипеди; Подложки и калъфи за седалки за велосипеди; Помпи за амортисьори за велосипед; Мъниста за спици на велосипед; Стойки и места за съхранение на велосипеди; Консумативи и комплекти за ремонт на велосипедни гуми; Ремъци и щипки за педали на велосипед; Инструменти за велосипеди; Части и аксесоари за велосипедни ремаркета; Ремаркета за велосипеди; Велотренажори; Велосипедни тренировъчни колела; Транспортни чанти и калъфи за велосипеди; Стойки за дъски за водни спортове за велосипеди; Комплекти за преобразуване на електрически велосипеди
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Езда на велосипеде > Аксессуары для велосипедов: Аксессуары и крепления для велосипедных сумок; Велосумки, велорюкзаки и кофры; Аксессуары для велосипедных корзин; Корзины для велосипедов; Звонки и гудки для велосипедов; Держатели на велосипедную раму; Аксессуары и детали для детских велокресел; Детские велокресла; Средства для ухода и чистки велосипедов; Аксессуары для велокомпьютеров; Велокомпьютеры; Чехлы для велосипедов; Крылья для велосипедов; Защита рамы и наклейки на велосипед; Передние и задние багажники для велосипедов; Грипсы и украшения для велосипедного руля; Велосипедные фонари; Замки для велосипедов; Зеркала для велосипедов; Держатели для телефона на велосипед; Детали и аксессуары для велосипедных насосов; Насосы для велосипедов; Аксессуары для велосипедных багажников; Чехлы и мягкие накладки на седла велосипедов; Насосы для вилок и амортизаторов; Украшения на велосипедные спицы; Стойки и держатели для велосипедов; Наборы и материалы для ремонта велосипедных шин; Ремни и туклипсы для велосипедных педалей; Инструменты для велосипедов; Детали и аксессуары для велосипедных прицепов; Прицепы для велосипедов; Велостанки; Боковые колеса для велосипедов; Сумки и кейсы для перевозки велосипедов; Велосипедные багажники для досок для водных видов спорта; Наборы для электрификации велосипедов
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Cyklistika > Jízdní kola – příslušenství: Příslušenství a úchyty na brašny na kolo; Tašky a nosiče na kola; Příslušenství pro košíky na kolo; Košíky na kola; Zvonky a klaksony na kola; Košíky na lahve pro jízdní kola; Příslušenství/díly pro dětské sedačky na kola; Dětská sedátka na kolo; Prostředky pro čištění a údržbu jízdních kol; Cyklopočítače – příslušenství; Cyklopočítače; Obaly na kolo; Blatníky na kola; Ochrana rámu kola a samolepky; Přední a zadní nosiče na kola; Gripy a ozdoby na řidítka; Světla na kolo; Zámky na kola; Zrcátka na kola; Držáky telefonu na kolo; Díly a příslušenství k pumpičkám na kolo; Hustilky na jízdní kola; Příslušenství k nosičům na kolo; Čalounění a obaly na sedla na kolo; Hustilky na galusky; Ozdobné korálky na výplet jízdních kol; Stojany na kola a ukládání kol; Sady na opravu a záplaty na pláště jízdních kol; Klipsny a řemínky na jízdní kola; Cyklistické nářadí; Díly a příslušenství k vozíkům za kolo; Vozíky ke kolům; Cyklistické trenažéry; Dětská kolečka ke kolům; Transportní tašky a pouzdra na kola; Cyklistické nosiče na surfová prkna; Sady elektrického pohonu pro kola